Connecticut, session 2026, HB05428.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Section 51-277a of the 2026 supplement to the general
2 statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
3 (Effective from passage):
4 (a) (1) Whenever a peace officer, in the performance of such officer's
5 duties, uses physical force upon another person and such person dies as
6 a result thereof or uses deadly physical force, as defined in section 53a-
7 3, upon another person, the Division of Criminal Justice shall cause an
8 investigation to be made and the Inspector General shall have the
9 responsibility of determining whether the use of physical force by the
10 peace officer was justifiable under section 53a-22. The use of an
11 electronic defense weapon, as defined in section 53a-3, by a peace officer
12 shall not be considered deadly physical force for purposes of this
13 section.
sHB5428 / File No. 599 1

sHB5428 File No. 599
14 (2) (A) Except as provided under subdivision (1) of this subsection,
15 whenever a person dies [in the] within the physical custody of a peace
16 officer or law enforcement agency, the Inspector General shall
17 investigate and determine whether physical force was used by a peace
18 officer upon the deceased person, and if so, whether the use of physical
19 force by the peace officer was justifiable under section 53a-22. If the
20 Inspector General determines the deceased person may have died as a
21 result of criminal action not involving the use of force by a peace officer,
22 the Inspector General shall refer such case to the Chief State's Attorney
23 or a state's attorney for potential prosecution.
24 (B) Except as provided under subdivision (1) of this subsection or
25 subparagraph (A) of subdivision (2) of this subsection, whenever a
26 person dies [in the] within the physical custody of the Commissioner of
27 Correction, the Inspector General shall investigate and determine
28 whether the deceased person may have died as a result of criminal
29 action, and, if so, refer such case to the Chief State's Attorney or a state's
30 attorney for potential prosecution. The Inspector General may issue a
31 report concerning the death of such person, which may include, but
32 need not be limited to, any recommended future action to be taken by
33 said commissioner.
34 (3) Whenever a person who (A) is a next of kin of a deceased person,
35 (B) is not notified of such deceased person's death as required pursuant
36 to section 7-294mm and no other person who is a next of kin of the
37 deceased person was so notified, and (C) requests of the Office of the
38 Inspector General an investigation of the lack of notification or timely
39 notification of such death, the Inspector General shall investigate and
40 determine whether there was any malfeasance on the part of a peace
41 officer or a supervisor of the peace officer in the failure to provide such
42 notification or timely notification, and if so, may make
43 recommendations to the Police Officer Standards and Training Council
44 established under section 7-294b concerning censure, suspension,
45 renewal, cancelation or revocation of the peace officer's or supervisor's
46 certification, provided any such recommendation may be made to said
47 council only in a case where such failure is found to be intentional or
sHB5428 / File No. 599 2

sHB5428 File No. 599
48 made with reckless indifference. If there is no finding that such failure
49 was intentional or made with reckless indifference, a recommendation
50 may be made to the officer's or supervisor's employing agency for any
51 further disciplinary action as so determined by such employing agency.
52 (4) The Inspector General shall request the appropriate law
53 enforcement agency to provide such assistance as is necessary to
54 investigate and make a determination under subdivision (1), (2) or (3) of
55 this subsection.
56 (5) Whenever a peace officer, in the performance of such officer's
57 duties, uses physical force or deadly physical force upon another person
58 and such person dies as a result thereof, the Inspector General shall
59 complete a preliminary status report that shall include, but need not be
60 limited to, (A) the name of the deceased person, (B) the gender, race,
61 ethnicity and age of the deceased person, (C) the date, time and location
62 of the injury causing such death, (D) the law enforcement agency
63 involved, (E) the status on the toxicology report, if available, and (F) the
64 death certificate, if available. The Inspector General shall complete the
65 report and submit a copy of such report not later than five business days
66 after the cause of the death is available to the Chief State's Attorney and,
67 in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a, to the joint standing
68 committees of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
69 relating to the judiciary and public safety.
70 (b) Upon the conclusion of the investigation of an incident described
71 in subdivision (1) or (2) of subsection (a) of this section, the Inspector
72 General shall file a report with the Chief State's Attorney which shall
73 contain the following: (1) The circumstances of the incident, (2) a
74 determination of whether the use of physical force by the peace officer
75 was justifiable under section 53a-22, and (3) any recommended future
76 action to be taken by the [Office of the Inspector General] law
77 enforcement agency as a result of the incident. The Chief State's
78 Attorney shall provide a copy of the report to the chief executive officer
79 of the municipality in which the incident occurred and to the
80 Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public Protection or the chief
sHB5428 / File No. 599 3

sHB5428 File No. 599
81 of police of such municipality, as the case may be, and shall make such
82 report available to the public on the Division of Criminal Justice's
83 Internet web site not later than forty-eight hours after the copies are
84 provided to the chief executive officer and the commissioner or chief of
85 police.
86 (c) The Office of the Inspector General shall prosecute any case in
87 which the Inspector General determines that (1) the use of force by a
88 peace officer was not justifiable under section 53a-22, or (2) there was a
89 failure to intervene in such incident or to report any such incident, as
90 required under subsection (a) of section 7-282e or section 18-81nn.
91 Sec. 2. Section 51-277e of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
92 is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from
93 passage):
94 (a) There is established the Office of the Inspector General that shall
95 be a separate office within the Division of Criminal Justice. Not later
96 than October 1, 2021, the Criminal Justice Commission established
97 pursuant to section 51-275a shall appoint a deputy chief state's attorney
98 as Inspector General who shall lead the Office of the Inspector General.
99 The office shall: (1) Conduct investigations of peace officers in
100 accordance with section 51-277a, as amended by this act; (2) prosecute
101 any case in which the Inspector General determines a peace officer used
102 force found to not be justifiable pursuant to section 53a-22 or where a
103 police officer or correction officer fails to intervene in any such incident
104 or to report any such incident, as required under subsection (a) of
105 section 7-282e or section 18-81nn, as applicable; (3) investigate any
106 failure to report the death of a person in accordance with the provisions
107 of section 7-294mm; (4) investigate any failure to report in accordance
108 with the provisions of subdivision (1) of subsection (h) of section 7-294d;
109 (5) investigate the death of a person within the physical custody of a
110 peace officer or law enforcement agency or the Commissioner of
111 Correction in accordance with the provisions of subdivision (2) of
112 subsection (a) of section 51-277a, as amended by this act; and [(5)] (6)
113 make recommendations to the Police Officer Standards and Training
sHB5428 / File No. 599 4

sHB5428 File No. 599
114 Council established under section 7-294b concerning censure and
115 suspension, renewal, cancelation or revocation of a peace officer's
116 certification, provided in the case of a failure to report a death of a
117 person, any such recommendation may be made to said council only in
118 a case where such failure is found to be intentional or made with
119 reckless indifference, or if there is no finding that such failure was
120 intentional or made with reckless indifference, a recommendation may
121 be made to the officer's employing agency for any further disciplinary
122 action as so determined by such employing agency.
123 (b) The Inspector General shall serve a term of four years from July
124 first in the year of the appointment unless sooner removed by the
125 Criminal Justice Commission. The commission shall not be precluded
126 from reappointing an individual who has previously served as
127 Inspector General.
128 (c) An Inspector General may be removed or otherwise disciplined
129 only in accordance with section 51-278b.
130 (d) The Inspector General may issue subpoenas to municipalities, law
131 enforcement units, as defined in section 7-294, the Department of
132 Correction and any employee or former employee of the municipality,
133 unit or department (1) requiring the production of reports, records or
134 other documents concerning an investigation described in subsection (a)
135 of this section that is undertaken by the Inspector General, and (2)
136 compelling the attendance and testimony of any person having
137 knowledge pertinent to such investigation at an investigative deposition
138 conducted by the Inspector General, or the Inspector General's designee.
139 (e) A chief of police of a municipality, the Commissioner of
140 Emergency Services and Public Protection or the Commissioner of
141 Correction may refer and the Inspector General shall accept any such
142 referral of an incident described in subsection (a) of this section for
143 purposes of an investigation.
144 (f) The Office of the Inspector General shall be at a location that is
145 separate from the locations of the Office of the Chief State's Attorney or
sHB5428 / File No. 599 5

sHB5428 File No. 599
146 any of the state's attorneys for the judicial districts.
147 (g) The Inspector General may employ necessary staff to fulfil the
148 duties of the Office of the Inspector General described in subsection (a)
149 of this section. Such staff shall be selected by the Inspector General
150 within the confines of any existing collective bargaining agreement and
151 shall include, but not be limited to, an assistant state's attorney or a
152 deputy assistant state's attorney, an inspector and administrative staff.
153 As needed by and upon request of the Inspector General, the Office of
154 the Chief State's Attorney shall ensure assistance from additional
155 assistant state's attorneys or deputy assistant state's attorneys,
156 inspectors and administrative staff.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage 51-277a
Sec. 2 from passage 51-277e
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Section 1(a), "deadly force" was changed to "deadly physical force"
for accuracy.
JUD Joint Favorable Subst. -LCO
sHB5428 / File No. 599 6

sHB5428 File No. 599
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill, which makes clarifying and conforming changes to the
powers and duties of the Office of the Inspector General, does not result
in a fiscal impact as the changes largely align with current practice.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
sHB5428 / File No. 599 7

sHB5428 File No. 599
OLR Bill Analysis
sHB 5428
AN ACT CONCERNING THE POWERS AND DUTIES OF THE
OFFICE OF THE INSPECTOR GENERAL.